Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-1373
Cremation; right to authorize.

The right to authorize the cremation of human remains and the final
disposition of the cremated remains, except in the case of a minor subject
to section 23-1824 and unless other directions have been given by the decedent
in the form of a testamentary disposition or a pre-need contract, vests pursuant
to section 30-2223.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 19;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1190;

Laws 2014, LB998, § 16.
April 10, 2014